North Carolina, session 2025, SB253.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Of the funds appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department
of Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds shall be allocated to the Pitt-Greenville Airport to be used for the purpose of
building a new General Aviation Terminal for the purpose of flood mitigation.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S253-v-1*